Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.360

Filing, registration, statement, exemption not conclusive as to truth or completeness—Unlawful representations.

Neither the fact that an application for registration under RCW 21.20.050, a registration statement under RCW 21.20.180 or 21.20.210 has been filed, nor the fact that a person or security is effectively registered, constitutes a finding by the director that any document filed under this chapter is true, complete, and not misleading. Neither any such fact nor the fact that an exemption or exception is available for a security or a transaction means that the director has passed in any way upon the merits or qualifications of, or recommended or given approval to, any person, security, or transaction. It is unlawful to make, or cause to be made, to any prospective purchaser, customer, or client any representation inconsistent with this section.

[ 2016 c 61 s 11; 1975 1st ex.s. c 84 s 21; 1959 c 282 s 36.]